Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 8. Rail Track Motor Cars

§ 37-9-801.
Requirements as to equipment.

It shall be unlawful for any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within the boundaries of the state of Wyoming and engaged in the business of common carrier to operate for or transport its employees in a motor car which is not equipped with a reasonably substantial top for the protection of said employees from rain, snow, sleet and hail, and equipped with a transparent windshield sufficient in width and height to reasonably protect said employees, which windshield shall be of safety glass and such car shall also be equipped with a permanently placed electric headlamp of sufficient candlepower as to render visible at a distance of three hundred (300) feet in advance of such car under ordinary atmospheric conditions, any obstruction, landmark, warning sign or grade crossing on such railroad. Said car shall also be equipped with one (1) red electric light on the rear end thereof with sufficient candlepower as to be visible at a distance of three hundred (300) feet under ordinary atmospheric conditions, and such car shall also be equipped with a windshield wiper that will remove rain, snow and sleet from the windshield on such car while such car is moving and said windshield shall be so devised that the driver of said car can start or stop said windshield wiper while he is driving the car.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-234.

§ 37-9-802.
Penalty; exceptions.

Any owner or operator of a railroad running through or within this state as a common carrier of persons or property or both, for compensation, who either operates for its employees, or who furnishes to its employees for their transportation to or from the place or places where they are required to labor, a rail track motor car that has not been fully equipped as required by W.S.

37-9-801

, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for each offense, and each day or part of a day it operates or furnishes each of the rail track motor cars not so equipped as provided in W.S.

37-9-801

, to its employees for operation to or from the place or places where they are required to work shall constitute a separate offense, provided that any common carrier that has not been able to equip its rail track motor cars as required by the provisions of W.S. 37-9-801, on or before the effective date can, by applying to the department of transportation, which is authorized to, and upon good cause shown, grant by order, additional time to any owner or operator of a common carrier by railroad, in which to equip the cars, not to exceed one (1) year from the effective date of this act. When an order has been granted by the department to the carrier, the provisions of W.S. 37-9-801 and

37-9-802

penalizing rail carriers who do not equip their cars shall not be applicable to those carriers securing an order for additional time in which to equip their cars during the period granted to them only by order of the department.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 136, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 37-235; Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 3.